Indiana, session 2026, SB158.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-8-16.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 16.5. Lake County Rounding of Local Taxes Pilot
Program
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to locals in Lake County.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "local unit" means any:
(1) county;
(2) township;
(3) city;
(4) town;
(5) school corporation; or
(6) special taxing district.
Sec. 3. The Lake County rounding of local taxes pilot program
is established to accommodate the phaseout of the penny by the
federal government.
Sec. 4. (a) If a tax amount payable to a local unit has a:
2026 IN 158—LS 6646/DI 134


(1) one (1), two (2), six (6), or seven (7) in the second decimal
place, the local unit must round the tax amount downward to
the next amount divisible by five cents ($0.05); or
(2) three (3), four (4), eight (8), or nine (9) in the second
decimal place, the local unit must round the tax amount
upward to the next amount divisible by five cents ($0.05).
(b) For a tax amount payable to a local unit that is less than five
cents ($0.05), the local unit shall round the tax amount down to
zero cents ($0.00).
2026 IN 158—LS 6646/DI 134